src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON DRA
     +V+Inf:dra   #          ;
     +V+Inf+Pass:dras   #          ;
     +V+Imp:dra   #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:drar  #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:dras  #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:dro   #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:drog  #          ;
  +V+PrfPtc:dratt #          ;
  +V+PrsPtc:dra   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON XIKKE
          ikke+V+Inf:ikke  #          ;
          ikke+V+Inf+Pass:ikkes  #          ;
          ikke+V+Imp:ikk   #          ;
      ikke+V+Ind+Prs:ikker #          ;
 ikke+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ikkes #          ;
      ikke+V+Ind+Prt:akk   #          ;
       ikke+V+PrfPtc:ukket #          ;
       ikke+V+PrsPtc:ikk   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON DRIVE
          +V+Inf:drive  #          ;
          +V+Inf+Pass:drives  #          ;
          +V+Imp:driv   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:driver #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:drives #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:drev   #          ;
       +V+PrfPtc:drevet #          ;
       +V+PrsPtc:driv   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON DØLGE
          +V+Inf:dølge  #          ;
          +V+Inf+Pass:dølges  #          ;
          +V+Imp:dølg   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:dølger #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:dølges #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:dulgte #          ;
       +V+PrfPtc:dulgt  #          ;
       +V+PrsPtc:dølg   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON DØ
          +V+Inf:dø   #          ;
          +V+Imp:dø   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:dør  #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:døes #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:døde #          ;
       +V+PrfPtc:dødd #          ;
        +V+Prdtc:dø   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON EIE
          eie+V+Inf:eie  #          ;
          eie+V+Inf+Pass:eies  #          ;
          eie+V+Imp:ei   #          ;
      eie+V+Ind+Prs:eiwe #          ;
 eie+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:eies #          ;
      eie+V+Ind+Prt:eide #          ;
       eie+V+PrfPtc:eid  #          ;
       eie+V+PrsPtc:ei   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON ETE
          +V+Inf:+  #          ;
          +V+Inf+Pass:+s  #          ;
          +V+Imp:et   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:+r #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:+s #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:åt   #          ;
       +V+PrfPtc:ett  #          ;
       +V+PrsPtc:et   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON FALLE
          +V+Inf:falle  #          ;
          +V+Imp:fall   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:faller #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:falles #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:falt   #          ;
       +V+PrfPtc:falt   #          ;
       +V+PrsPtc:fall   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON FARE
          +V+Inf:fare  #          ;
          +V+Imp:far   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:farer #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:fares #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:for   #          ;
       +V+PrfPtc:fart  #          ;
       +V+PrsPtc:far   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON FINNE
          +V+Inf:finne  #          ;
          +V+Imp:finn   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:finner #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:finnes #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:fant   #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Pass:fantes #          ;
        inne+V+PrfPtc:funnet #          ;
       +V+PrsPtc:finn   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON FISE
          +V+Inf:fise  #          ;
          +V+Imp:fis   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:fiser #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:fises #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:fes   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:feis  #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:fiste #          ;
       +V+PrfPtc:fist  #          ;
       +V+PrfPtc:feset #          ;
       +V+PrsPtc:fis   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON FLY
          +V+Inf:fly    #          ;
          +V+Imp:fly    #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:flyr   #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:flys   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:fløy   #          ;
       +V+PrfPtc:flydd  #          ;
       +V+PrfPtc:fløyet #          ;
       +V+PrsPtc:fly    prfptcsuff ;
LEXICON LYGE
+V+Inf:lyge    #          ;
+V+Imp:lyg     #          ;
+V+Ind+Prs:lyger   #          ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:lyges   #          ; ! Fiks meg
+V+Ind+Prt:løy     #          ;
+V+PrfPtc:løyet   #          ;
+V+PrfPtc:løyet   #          ;
+V+PrsPtc:lygende prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON LJUGE
+V+Inf:ljuge    #          ;
+V+Imp:ljug     #          ;
+V+Ind+Prs:ljuger   #          ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ljuges   #          ; ! Fiks meg
+V+Ind+Prt:løy      #          ;
+V+PrfPtc:løyet    #          ;
+V+PrfPtc:løyet    #          ;
+V+PrsPtc:ljugende prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON FLYGE
+V+Inf:flyge  #          ;
+V+Imp:flyg   #          ;
+V+Ind+Prs:flyger #          ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:flyges #          ; ! Fiks meg
+V+Ind+Prt:fløy   #          ;
+V+PrfPtc:flydd  #          ;
+V+PrfPtc:fløyet #          ;
+V+PrsPtc:fly    prfptcsuff ;
+V+PrsPtc:flyv   prfptcsuff ;


LEXICON FLYTE
+V+Inf:flyte    # ;
+V+Imp:flyt     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:flyter   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:flytes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:fløt     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Err/Orth:fløyt    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:flaut    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:flytt    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:flytende # ;

LEXICON LATE
+V+Inf:late  # ;
+V+Inf+Pass:lates # ;
+V+Imp:lat   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:later # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:lates # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:lot   # ;
+V+PrfPtc:latt  # ;

LEXICON FRYSE
+V+Inf:fryse    # ;
+V+Imp:frys     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:fryser   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:fryses   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:frøs     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:frøys    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:fraus    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:fryst    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:frosset  # ;
+V+PrsPtc:frysende # ;

LEXICON FYKE
+V+Inf:fyke    # ;
+V+Imp:fyk     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:fyker   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:fykes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:føk     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:fauk    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:føyk    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:føket   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:fykende # ;

LEXICON FÅ
+V+Inf:få     # ;
+V+Imp:få     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:får    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:fikk   # ;
+V+PrfPtc:fått   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:fående # ;

LEXICON FØLGE
+V+Inf:følge    # ;
+V+Imp:følg     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:følger   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:følges   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:fulgte   # ;
+V+PrfPtc:fulgt    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:følgende # ;

LEXICON GALE
+V+Inf:gale    # ;
+V+Imp:gal     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:galer   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gales   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gol     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:galte   # ;
+V+PrfPtc:galt    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:galende # ;

LEXICON GIDDE
+V+Inf:gidde    # ;
+V+Imp:gidd     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:gidd     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gidd     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gidd     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:gidd     # ;
+V+PrsPtc:giddende # ;

LEXICON GI
+V+Inf:gi      # ;
+V+Imp:gi      # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:gir     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gis     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:ga      # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gav     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:gitt    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:giende  # ;
+V+PrsPtc:givende # ;

LEXICON GJELDE
+V+Inf:gjelde    # ;
+V+Imp:gjeld     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:gjelder   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gjeldes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gjaldt    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:gjeldt    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:gjeldende # ;

LEXICON GJØRE
+V+Inf:gjøre    # ;
+V+Imp:gjør     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:gjør     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gjøres   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gjorde   # ;
+V+PrfPtc:gjort    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:gjørende # ;

LEXICON GLEPPE
+V+Inf:gleppe    # ;
+V+Imp:glepp     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:glepper   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gleppes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:glapp     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:gluppet   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:gleppende # ;

LEXICON GLI
+V+Inf:gli      # ;
+V+Imp:gli      # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:glir     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:glis     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gled     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:glidd    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:glidende # ;

LEXICON XIPPE
+V+Inf:ippe    # ;
+V+Imp:ipp     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:ipper   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ippes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:app     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:uppet   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:ippende # ;

LEXICON GNAGE
+V+Inf:gnage    # ;
+V+Imp:gnag     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:gnager   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gnages   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gnog     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gnagde   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gnaget   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gnaga    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:gnagd    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:gnagende # ;

LEXICON GNI
+V+Inf:gni     # ;
+V+Imp:gni     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:gnir    # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gnies   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gned    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gnei    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:gnidd   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:gniende # ;

LEXICON GRAVE
+V+Inf:grave    # ;
+V+Imp:grav     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:graver   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:graves   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gravde   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:grov     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:gravd    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:gravet   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:gravende # ;
