src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON irregular-verb
dra:                     DRA     ;
            bedra:be       DRA     ;
            bidra:bi       DRA     ;
           inndra:inn       DRA     ;
           oppdra:opp       DRA     ;
          foredra:fore       DRA     ;
          overdra:over       DRA     ;
              drive:       DRIVE   ;
           fordrive:for       DRIVE   ;
          gjendrive:gjen       DRIVE   ;
           oppdrive:opp       DRIVE   ;
          overdrive:over       DRIVE   ;
            dø:       DØ      ;
          selvdø:selv       DØ      ;
          sjøldø:sjøl       DØ      ;
             dølge:        DØLGE   ;
eie:		     EIE     ;
ete:		     ETE     ;
              falle:       FALLE   ;
            anfalle:an       FALLE   ;
            bifalle:bi       FALLE   ;
          bortfalle:bort       FALLE   ;
          bønnfalle:bønn       FALLE   ;
           forfalle:for       FALLE   ;
          forefalle:fore       FALLE   ;
          overfalle:over       FALLE   ;
           tilfalle:til       FALLE   ;
              fare:       FARE    ;
           misfare:mis       FARE    ;
          saumfare:saum       FARE    ;
          skamfare:skam       FARE    ;
              finne:       FINNE   ;
            avfinne:av       FINNE   ;
            befinne:be       FINNE   ;
           frifinne:fri       FINNE   ;
          gjenfinne:gjen       FINNE   ;
           innfinne:inn       FINNE   ;
               fise:      FISE    ;
              fly:       FLY     ;
          overfly:       FLY     ;
              flyge:       FLYGE   ;
              flyte:       FLYTE   ;
           tilf.yte:til       FLYTE   ;
     etterlate:etter LATE ;
       forlate:for   LATE ;
       innlate:inn   LATE ;
       løslate:løs   LATE ;
       nedlate:ned   LATE ;
       opplate:opp   LATE ;
      overlate:over  LATE ;
       tillate:til   LATE ;
       unnlate:unn   LATE ;
       utelate:ute   LATE ;
       årelate:åre   LATE ;
       fryse:              FRYSE   ;
         fyke:            FYKE    ;
få:                     FÅ      ;
   følge:                  FØLGE   ;
         etterfølge:etter       FØLGE   ;
           forfølge:for       FØLGE   ;
            gale:         GALE    ;
            angi:an       GI      ;
            avgi:av       GI      ;
            begi:be       GI      ;
         ettergi:etter       GI      ;
          foregi:fore       GI      ;
          gjengi:gjen       GI      ;
         grunngi:grunn       GI      ;
           hengi:hen       GI      ;
           inngi:inn       GI      ;
           medgi:med       GI      ;
          navngi:navn       GI      ;
          namngi:namn       GI      ;
            omgi:om       GI      ;
          overgi:over       GI      ;
           tilgi:til       GI      ;
            utgi:ut       GI      ;
            gidde:         GIDDE   ;
             gjelde:        GJELDE  ;
          gjengjelde:gjen       GJELDE  ;
           forgjelde:for       GJELDE  ;
     anskueliggjøre:anskuelig       GJØRE   ;
       bekjentgjøre:bekjent       GJØRE   ;
     borgerliggjøre:borgerlig       GJØRE   ;
           frigjøre:fri       GJØRE   ;
          klargjøre:klar       GJØRE   ;
       levendegjøre:levende       GJØRE   ;
   menneskeliggjøre:menneskelig       GJØRE   ;
     offentliggjøre:offentlig       GJØRE   ;
          redegjøre:rede       GJØRE   ;
         saliggjøre:salig       GJØRE   ;
   sjølstendiggjøre:sjølstendig       GJØRE   ;
      tjenestegjøre:tjeneste       GJØRE   ;
        umuliggjøre:umulig       GJØRE   ;
            utgjøre:ut       GJØRE   ;
 vitenskapeliggjøre:vitenskapelig       GJØRE   ;
              gleppe:       GLEPPE  ;
              gli:       GLI     ;
       glippe:gl     XIPPE  ;
             gnage:        GNAGE   ;
               gni:      GNI     ;
              grave:       GRAVE   ;
               ljuge:      LJUGE   ;
     lyge:                LYGE    ;
        slippe:sl   XIPPE  ;
            dr       XIKKE   ;
            st       XIKKE   ;
LEXICON regular-verb
glippe:gl XIPPE ;
unnslippe:unnsl XIPPE ;
unndra:unn DRA  ;
pådra:på DRA  ;
frafalle:fra FALLE  ;
inndrive:inn DRIVE  ;
undergi:under GI ;
